Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.481

Violations may be enjoined.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter in the superior court of the county in which the defendant resides or maintains his or her principal place of business or Thurston county.

[ 1999 c 291 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 102 s 4. Formerly RCW 15.36.600.]